Indiana, session 2026, HB1121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-27.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 27.1. Law Enforcement Officer Drug and Alcohol
Testing After Officer-Involved Shooting
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement agency" has
the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-17-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement officer" has
the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-1-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "officer-involved shooting"
means any instance when a law enforcement officer discharges
their firearm, causing injury or death to a person, in the line of
duty.
Sec. 4. (a) A law enforcement agency that employs a law
enforcement officer involved in an officer-involved shooting must
administer alcohol and drug testing to the applicable law
enforcement officer immediately after the officer-involved shooting
2026 IN 1121—LS 6499/DI 116


in accordance with protocols adopted by the law enforcement
agency described in subsection (b).
(b) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt and implement
protocols to administer subsection (a). The protocols shall
prescribe that the alcohol and drug testing must be administered
as soon as practicable after the officer-involved shooting but not
later than the end of the applicable law enforcement officer's shift
or work day.
2026 IN 1121—LS 6499/DI 116